Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Subchapter 6. Miscellaneous Provisions

§ 3831.
Cutting ice and not fencing hole.

A person who takes ice from water over which people are accustomed to pass and does not place around the opening thereby made in the ice suitable guards to prevent a person, team, or vehicle from falling into such hole or opening shall be fined not more than $50.00.

§ 3832.
Repealed.
1979, No. 152 (Adj. Sess.).

§ 3833.
Unlawful taking of tangible personal property; penalty.

A person who, without the consent of the owner, takes and carries away or causes to be taken and carried away any tangible personal property with the intent of depriving the owner temporarily of the lawful possession of his or her property shall be fined not more than $100.00.
This section shall not be construed to limit or restrict prosecutions for larceny or theft.

HISTORY:

Added 1977, No. 227 (Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 17, 1978.

§ 3834.
Removal of surveying monuments.

A person who knowingly removes or alters monuments marking the boundary of lands or knowingly defaces, alters, or removes marks upon any tree, post, or stake that is a monument designating a point, course, or line in the boundary of a parcel of land shall be fined $100.00 and shall be civilly liable for the replacement cost and any consequential damages.
However, land surveyors in their professional practice may perpetuate such monumentation by adding additional marks, or by remonumenting nonsubstantial monuments or by the placing of new monuments to preserve monuments to be destroyed or made inaccessible.

HISTORY:

Added 1985, No. 116 (Adj. Sess.), § 1.